Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 12. Energy Coordinator

§ 1131.
Energy coordinator; duties.

The legislative body of a municipality may appoint, and determine the length of term for, an energy coordinator.

An energy coordinator shall coordinate existing energy resources in the town and cooperate with the municipal planning commission and with those federal, State, and regional agencies of government which are responsible for energy matters.

An energy coordinator may study and evaluate sources of energy which are alternatives to those presently available with a view toward the more efficient and economical utilization of existing and potential energy resources.

An energy coordinator shall make periodic reports of his or her activities to the legislative body as it may require and may perform such other duties, studies, or examinations as may be required by the legislative body.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

2007, No. 1

, § 1.